Hawaii statutes.
§601-13 Publication of notices and process.
(a) All notices or process required or permitted by law, by the rules of any
court, or by judicial order to be published or advertised in judicial
proceedings in the State shall be published or advertised in a newspaper or
newspapers having a general circulation within the county in which the judicial
proceedings are commenced or had, except as otherwise provided.

(b) When the notices or process are required
to be published or advertised once or more in a given interval for or in a
successive number of intervals, the use of the word "successive"
shall not be construed to require publication in more than the stated number of
intervals; for example, a requirement of publication "once a week for (or
in) three successive weeks" shall require only three publications.

(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
in all family court cases, if the plaintiff or petitioner, as a result of
impoverishment, is unable to publish notice as required by subsection (a), the
plaintiff or petitioner shall file an affidavit attesting to impoverishment and
to the fact that, after due and diligent search, the whereabouts of the
individual sought to be served are unknown. Upon such filings, the family
court shall order that service be made by forwarding a certified copy of the
pleadings and process to the individual at the last known address by registered
or certified mail, with a return receipt requested and a directive to deliver
to addressee only, by sending a certified copy of the pleadings and process to
the defendant's or respondent's closest known relative, if any can be found,
and by posting a copy of the pleadings and process at the courthouse in which
the pleadings and process have been filed. Service shall be completed thirty
days after mailing. The plaintiff or petitioner shall attest to the fact of
the mailing and the date thereof by affidavit, attaching the sender's receipt
for that mail and, if available, the return receipt and envelope. [L 1919, c
31, §1; RL 1925, §2219; RL 1935, §3579; am L 1941, c 36, §1; RL 1945, §9580; RL
1955, §213-10; HRS §601-13; am L 1972, c 88, §1(e); am L 2012, c 290, §2]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 4(e).

Proof of publication, see RCC rule 11.

Case Notes

Cited: 45 H. 90, 91, 363 P.2d 1006 (1961).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next